Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1714
Approval; contest; filing fee.

Any person who files a petition with the district court to contest a decision of the city council, village board of trustees, or county board of commissioners or supervisors shall pay the required filing fee.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 14.